Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.14
Franchise or agreement, defined.

Franchise or agreement,
with reference to the relationship between a manufacturer and wholesaler,
includes one or more of the following:

(1) A commercial relationship
of a definite duration or continuing indefinite duration which is not required
to be in writing;

(2)
A relationship by which the wholesaler is granted the right to offer and sell
the manufacturer's brands by the manufacturer;

(3) A relationship by which the franchise,
as an independent business, constitutes a component of the manufacturer's
distribution system;

(4)
A relationship by which the operation of the wholesaler's business is substantially
associated with the manufacturer's brand, advertising, or other commercial
symbol designating the manufacturer; and

(5) A relationship by which the operation of the wholesaler's
business is substantially reliant on the manufacturer for the continued supply
of beer.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 22.